fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage de la pince de batterie: Verrouillage à came; Boulon pour clé de batterie; Boulon hexagonal (outil requis); Levier/déblocage rapide; Poignée à cliquet; Vis moletée; Boulon à oreilles (serrage manuel); Autre
nb: Låsemekanisme for trommelklemme: Kamlås; Bolt for trommenøkkel; Sekskantskrue (verktøy kreves); Spak/hurtigkobling; Skrallehåndtak; Tommelskrue; Vingebolt (håndstrammet); Annet
ja: ドラムクランプロックメカニズム: カムロック; ドラムキーボルト; 六角ボルト (工具が必要); レバー/クイックリリース; ラチェットハンドル; サムスクリュー; 蝶ボルト (手締め); その他
fi: Rumpupuristimen lukitusmekanismi: Nokkalukko; Rumpuavaimen pultti; Kuusiopultti (vaatii työkalun); Vipu/pikakiinnike; Räikkäkahva; Sormiruuvi; Siipipultti (käsikiristeinen); Muu
ro-RO: Mecanism de blocare a clemei tobei: Blocare cu camă; Șurub pentru cheie de tobe; Șurub hexagonal (necesită unelte); Manetă/eliberare rapidă; Mâner cu clichet; Șurub cu cap striat; Șurub fluture (strângere manuală); Altele
ru: Механизм фиксации барабанного зажима: Кулачковый фиксатор; Болт под барабанный ключ; Шестигранный болт (требуется инструмент); Рычаг/быстросъемник; Трещоточная ручка; Барашковый винт; Барашковый болт (ручная затяжка); Другое
da: Låsemekanisme for tromleklemme: Knastlås; Trommenøglebolt; Sekskantbolt (værktøj påkrævet); Håndtag/hurtigudløser; Skraldehåndtag; Fingerskrue; Vingebolt (håndstramning); Andet
de: Verriegelungsmechanismus der Trommelklemme: Cam-Lock; Schraube für Stimmschlüssel; Sechskantschraube (Werkzeug erforderlich); Hebel/Schnellspanner; Ratschengriff; Rändelschraube; Flügelschraube (handfest); Sonstige
th: กลไกล็อคของแคลมป์จับกลอง: แคมล็อก; สลักกุญแจกลอง; น็อตหกเหลี่ยม (ต้องใช้เครื่องมือ); คันโยก/ปลดเร็ว; ด้ามจับเฟืองวงล้อ; สกรูหางปลา; น็อตหางปลา (ขันด้วยมือ); อื่นๆ
vi: Cơ chế khóa kẹp trống: Khóa chốt cam; Bu lông vặn bằng chìa lên dây; Bu lông lục giác (cần dụng cụ); Đòn bẩy/nhả nhanh; Tay vặn bánh cóc; Vít vặn bằng ngón tay cái; Bu lông cánh (vặn bằng tay); Khác
lt-LT: Būgno spaustuko fiksavimo mechanizmas: Kumštelinis užraktas; Būgno rakto varžtas; Šešiabriaunis varžtas (reikalingas įrankis); Svirtis / greitasis atleidimas; Reketinė rankena; Varžtas su rantyta galvute; Sparnuotasis varžtas (priveržiamas ranka); Kita
zh-CN: 鼓夹锁定机构: 凸轮锁; 鼓钥匙螺栓; 六角螺栓（需要工具）; 控制杆/快拆; 棘轮手柄; 翼形螺丝; 蝶形螺栓（手动拧紧）; 其他
cs: Zajišťovací mechanismus svěrky bubnu: Vačkový zámek; Šroub na ladicí klíč; Šestihranný šroub (vyžaduje nástroj); Páka/rychloupínák; Ráčna; Křídlatý šroub; Křídlový šroub (utahování rukou); Jiné
nl: Drumklem vergrendelingsmechanisme: Nokkenslot; Drumsleutelbout; Zeskantbout (gereedschap vereist); Hendel/snelsluiting; Ratelhendel; Duimschroef; Vleugelbout (handvast); Overige
pt-PT: Mecanismo de bloqueio da braçadeira do tambor: Fecho de came; Parafuso de chave de bateria; Parafuso sextavado (necessária ferramenta); Alavanca/desengate rápido; Manípulo de roquete; Parafuso de aperto manual; Parafuso de orelhas (aperto manual); Outro
pt-BR: Mecanismo de travamento da braçadeira do tambor: Trava de came; Parafuso de chave de bateria; Parafuso hexagonal (requer ferramenta); Alavanca/liberação rápida; Alavanca de catraca; Parafuso de aperto manual; Parafuso borboleta (aperto manual); Outros
sl-SI: Mehanizem za zaklepanje objemke bobna: Odmični zapah; Vijak za bobnarski ključ; Šestrobi vijak (potrebno orodje); Ročica/hitra sprostitev; Zaskočna ročica; Narebričeni vijak; Krilati vijak (za ročno zategovanje); Drugo
hr-HR: Mehanizam za zaključavanje stezaljke bubnja: Mehanizam sa zateznom polugom (cam lock); Vijak za ključ za bubanj; Šesterokutni vijak (potreban alat); Poluga / brza spojka; Ručka s čegrtaljkom; Vijak s nareckanom glavom; Krilni vijak (ručno stezanje); Ostalo
sk-SK: Zaisťovací mechanizmus svorky bubna: Vačkový zámok; Skrutka na ladiaci kľúč; Šesťhranná skrutka (vyžaduje sa nástroj); Páka/rýchloupínač; Račňová rukoväť; Skrutka s vrúbkovanou hlavou; Krídlová skrutka (na ručné utiahnutie); Iné
zh-TW: 鼓夾鎖定機制: 凸輪鎖; 鼓鑰匙螺栓; 六角螺栓 (需要工具); 槓桿/快拆; 棘輪把手; 翼形螺絲; 翼形螺栓 (手擰); 其他
en: Drum clamp locking mechanism: Cam lock; Drum key bolt; Hex bolt (tool required); Lever/quick release; Ratchet handle; Thumbscrew; Wing bolt (hand-tight); Other
ko: 드럼 클램프 잠금 메커니즘: 캠 락; 드럼 키 볼트; 육각 볼트(도구 필요); 레버/퀵 릴리스; 래칫 핸들; 썸스크루; 윙 볼트(손으로 조임); 기타
pl: Mechanizm blokowania zacisku perkusyjnego: Zacisk krzywkowy; Śruba na klucz perkusyjny; Śruba z łbem sześciokątnym (wymaga narzędzia); Dźwignia/szybkozamykacz; Rączka z mechanizmem zapadkowym; Śruba radełkowana; Śruba skrzydełkowa (dokręcana ręcznie); Inne
it: Meccanismo di bloccaggio del morsetto del tamburo: A camma; Bullone per chiave della batteria; Bullone esagonale (richiede attrezzo); Leva/sgancio rapido; Impugnatura a cricchetto; Vite a galletto; Bullone a farfalla (serraggio a mano); Altro
es: Mecanismo de bloqueo de la abrazadera del tambor: Cierre de leva; Perno de llave de batería; Perno hexagonal (requiere herramienta); Palanca/liberación rápida; Mango de trinquete; Tornillo moleteado; Perno de mariposa (ajuste manual); Otro
tr: Tambur kelepçesi kilitleme mekanizması: Kam kilidi; Davul akort anahtarı cıvatası; Altıgen cıvata (alet gerektirir); Mandal/hızlı açılan; Cırcırlı kol; Kelebek vida; Kelebek cıvata (elle sıkılan); Diğer
el: Μηχανισμός ασφάλισης σφιγκτήρα τυμπάνου: Κλειδαριά εκκέντρου; Βίδα για κλειδί τυμπάνου; Εξαγωνική βίδα (απαιτείται εργαλείο); Μοχλός/γρήγορη απασφάλιση; Λαβή καστάνιας; Χειρόβιδα; Βίδα πεταλούδα (σφίξιμο με το χέρι); Άλλο
sv: Låsmekanism för trumklämma: Excenterlås; Trumnyckelbult; Insexbult (verktyg krävs); Spak/snabbfäste; Spärrhandtag; Tumskruv; Vingbult (handåtdragen); Övrigt
bg-BG: Механизъм за заключване на скоба за барабан: Заключване с ексцентрик; Болт за ключ за барабани; Шестостенен болт (изисква се инструмент); Лост/бързо освобождаване; Дръжка с тресчотка; Винт с накатка; Крилчат болт (ръчно затягане); Друго
hu: Dobszorító rögzítő mechanizmus: Bütykös zár; Dobkulcsos csavar; Hatlapfejű csavar (szerszám szükséges); Karos/gyorskioldós; Racsnis kar; Szárnyas csavar; Szárnyas csavar (kézzel húzható); Egyéb